Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 3

Prime Contractor/Remote Contractor Payment

66-34-301. Remote contractor entitled to payment from prime contractor.

Performance by a remote contractor in accordance with a written contract with a prime contractor for improvement of real property entitles the remote contractor to payment from the prime contractor.

Acts 1991, ch. 45, § 1; 2020, ch. 749, § 23.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment inserted “prime” twice, substituted “remote contractor” for “subcontractor, materialman or furnisher”, “with a written” for “with such person’s written” and “entitles the remote contractor” for “shall entitle such person”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

66-34-302. Application for payment for work — Payment according to schedule for payments — Interest.

If a remote contractor has performed in accordance with the remote contractor's written contract with the prime contractor, then the prime contractor shall pay to the remote contractor the full amount earned by the remote contractor, subject only to any condition precedent for payment clause in the contract, and less only those amounts withheld in accordance with § 66-34-303. The payment must be made in accordance with the schedule for payments established within the contract and within thirty (30) days after application for payment is timely submitted by the remote contractor to the prime contractor, in accordance with the schedule.

The prime contractor shall also pay the remote contractor its pro rata share of any interest provided for in § 66-34-601 that has been received by the prime contractor.

Acts 1991, ch. 45, § 1; 2006, ch. 944, § 2; 2020, ch. 749, § 24.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 944, § 2 provided that the act, which rewrote this section, shall apply to all contracts executed after June 20, 2006.

Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (a), substituted “remote contractor” for “subcontractor, materialman or furnisher” five times, and inserted “prime” three times; and in (b), substituted “The prime contractor shall also pay the remote contractor” for “The subcontractor, materialman, or furnisher shall also be paid” and substituted “prime contractor” for “contractor” at the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

66-34-303. Withholding of payment or retainage by prime contractor.

This chapter does not prevent the prime contractor from reasonably withholding payment or a portion of payment to the remote contractor, as long as the withheld payment is in accordance with the written contract between the prime contractor and the remote contractor. The prime contractor may also withhold a reasonable amount of retainage as specified in the written contract between the prime contractor and remote contractor; except, that the retainage amount must not exceed five percent (5%) of the amount of the contract.

Acts 1991, ch. 45, § 1; 2007, ch. 201, § 6; 2020, ch. 749, § 25.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 201, § 7 provided that the act, which added the proviso at the end of the last sentence, shall apply to all construction contracts to which the act applies entered into on or after July 1, 2007.

Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “prime contractor” for “contractor” four times; in the first sentence, substituted “This chapter does not” for “Nothing in this chapter shall”, “remote contractor, as long as the” for “subcontractor, materialman or furnisher; provided, that such”, and “remote contractor.” for “subcontractor, materialman or furnisher.”; and in the second sentence, substituted “and remote contractor; except,” for “, subcontractor, materialman or furnisher; provided, however,”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

66-34-304. Payments to be held in trust by prime contractor.

Any sums received by the prime contractor as payment for work, services, equipment, and materials supplied by the remote contractor for improvements to real property must be held by the prime contractor in trust for the benefit and use of the remote contractor, and are subject to all legal and equitable remedies.

Acts 1991, ch. 45, § 1; 2020, ch. 749, § 26.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment inserted “prime” twice, and substituted “remote contractor” for “subcontractor, materialman or furnisher” twice.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.